Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-302
Rule 302. Applicability of federal law in civil cases.

In civil actions and proceedings, the effect of a presumption respecting a fact which is an element of a claim or defense as to which federal law supplies the rule of decision is determined in accordance with the federal law.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 9.